Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5214.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 277. (1) For tax years that begin on and after January 1,
2026, a taxpayer who is an eligible family caregiver may claim a
credit against the tax imposed under this part in an amount equal
to 30% of the qualified expenses incurred by the taxpayer during
the tax year or $2,000.00, whichever is less. The taxpayer shall
not include any qualified expenses for which the taxpayer was
reimbursed or otherwise compensated by insurance or any state or
federal assistance program.
(2) To be eligible for the credit under this section, the
KAS H03516'25 (H-1) 4m6kyo


taxpayer shall, in the form and manner as prescribed by the
department, provide the following information with the annual
return filed under this part on which a credit under this section
is claimed:
(a) Documentation to substantiate the qualified expenses
claimed under this section.
(b) The name and Social Security number or individual tax
identification number of the eligible family member for which
qualified expenses identified under subdivision (a) were incurred.
(c) If applicable, a copy of the certification required under
subsection (4)(c)(i)(A) for that eligible family member.
(3) If the amount of the credit allowed by this section
exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that
portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability must not be
refunded.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Activities of daily living" means ambulating, eating,
toileting, bathing, dressing, grooming, personal hygiene,
transferring, or continence.
(b) "Eligible family caregiver" means an individual who
satisfies each of the following:
(i) Is a resident of this state.
(ii) Provided care, meaning either physical care or financial
support, or both, for an eligible family member.
(iii) Personally incurred uncompensated qualified expenses
directly related to the provision of care for an eligible family
member of $2,000.00 or more.
(c) "Eligible family member" means a family member of the
eligible family caregiver who is not a resident of a nursing home,
KAS H03516'25 (H-1) 4m6kyo


home for the aged, or any other assisted living facility and meets
any of the following requirements in the following circumstances:
(i) Is 6 years of age or older and either of the following:
(A) Is unable to perform, without substantial assistance from
another individual, at least 2 activities of daily living due to a
loss of functional capacity as certified by a health care provider.
The certification required under this sub-subparagraph must have
been issued within the immediately preceding 24 months.
(B) Requires substantial supervision to protect such
individual from threats to health and safety due to severe
cognitive impairment.
(ii) Is at least 2 years of age but not 6 years of age, and is
unable, due to a loss of functional capacity, to perform without
substantial assistance from another individual at least 2 of the
following activities: eating, transferring, or ambulating.
(iii) Is under 2 years of age, and requires specific durable
medical equipment by reason of a severe health condition or
requires a skilled practitioner trained to address the individual's
condition to be available if the individual's parents or guardians
are absent.
(d) "Family member" means that term as defined under section 2
of the earned sick time act, 2018 PA 338, MCL 408.962.
(e) "Goods, services, and supports" means any of the
following:
(i) Human assistance, supervision, cuing and standby
assistance.
(ii) Assistive technologies and devices, including remote
health monitoring.
(iii) Environmental modifications for the home such as
KAS H03516'25 (H-1) 4m6kyo


structural and technological changes designed to enhance
accessibility, safety, and independence, including portable home
modifications.
(iv) Health maintenance tasks for preventative medical care and
routine physical support, such as medication management, health
monitoring tasks, skin care treatments, activities of daily living,
and other health-related activities for individuals that help
prevent diseases or manage chronic conditions or disabilities.
(v) Legal and financial services.
(vi) Transportation and travel.
(vii) Nonhealth items such as incontinence supplies.
(f) "Health care provider" means a physician, registered
professional nurse, or social worker licensed under article 15 of
the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838.
(g) "Instrumental activities of daily living" includes, but is
not limited to, meal planning and preparation, managing finances,
shopping for food, clothing, and other essential items, performing
essential household chores, communicating by phone or other media,
and traveling around and participating in the community.
(h) "Qualified expenses" means expenditures for goods,
services, and supports that assist an eligible family member with
accomplishing activities of daily living and instrumental
activities of daily living and are directly related to assisting
the eligible family caregiver in providing care for an eligible
family member or are specifically for use by an eligible family
member. Qualified expenses paid or incurred by the eligible family
caregiver include the following subparagraphs (i) to (vii) and
exclude subparagraph (viii):
(i) Expenditures for respite care.
KAS H03516'25 (H-1) 4m6kyo


(ii) Expenditures for counseling, support groups, or training
relating to caring for an eligible family member.
(iii) Transportation costs related to caring for an eligible
family member. Transportation costs claimed under this subparagraph
must not exceed the federal medical mileage rate for the current
tax year for which the credit is being claimed.
(iv) Expenditures for assistive technologies.
(v) Expenditures for hiring a home care aide or other direct
care worker for assistance.
(vi) Expenditures for health and medical care equipment.
(vii) Expenditures incurred for the improvements or
modifications of the eligible family caregiver's principal
residence or primary motor vehicle to ensure accessibility for an
eligible family member.
(viii) Expenditures for general household maintenance such as
painting, plumbing, or electrical regardless of whether such
maintenance is done to the inside or outside of the residence.
Final Page
KAS H03516'25 (H-1) 4m6kyo